Georgia, session 2025_26, HB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical practice, is amended by revising Code Section 43-34-37, relating to persons
authorized to perform artificial insemination and civil liability of physician or surgeon, as
follows:
"43-34-37.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Additional duty' means a medical task, which is not customarily learned during the
scholastic training of a physician assistant.
(2) 'Certified nurse practitioner' means a registered professional nurse who is licensed
by the Georgia Board of Nursing to engage in advanced practice registered nursing as a
H. B. 329
- 1 -

LC 46 1050
certified nurse practitioner to patients not necessarily within the physical presence but
under the personal direction or supervision of a supervising physician.
(3) 'Form C' means a Georgia Composite Medical Board document used by physicians
to delegate procedures to a certified nurse practitioner.
(4) 'Physician assistant' means a skilled person who is licensed by the Georgia
Composite Medical Board and who is qualified by academic and practical training to
provide services to patients not necessarily within the physical presence but under the
personal direction or supervision of a supervising physician.
(a)(b) Physicians and surgeons licensed to practice medicine in accordance with and under
this article, certified nurse practitioners, and physician assistants shall be the only persons
authorized to administer or perform artificial insemination upon any female human being.
Any other person or persons who shall attempt to administer or perform or who shall
actually administer or perform artificial insemination upon any female human being shall
be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in
the penitentiary for not less than one year nor more than five years.
(c) A certified nurse practitioner may administer or perform an artificial insemination only
if such practitioner has been delegated the authority to do so by a delegating physician or
surgeon through the use of a Form C and such physician or surgeon is physically present
at the location and during the time such artificial insemination is administered or
performed.
(d) A physician assistant may administer or perform an artificial insemination only if such
assistant has been delegated the authority to do so by a delegating physician or surgeon,
such physician or surgeon is physically present at the location and time such artificial
insemination is administered or performed, and such authority has been approved as an
additional duty for such assistant by the Georgia Composite Medical Board.
(b)(e) Any physician, or surgeon, certified nurse practitioner, or physician assistant who
obtains written authorization signed by both the husband and the wife authorizing him or
H. B. 329
- 2 -

LC 46 1050
her to perform or administer artificial insemination shall be relieved of civil liability to the
husband and wife or to any child conceived by artificial insemination for the result or
results of said artificial insemination, provided that the written authorization provided for
in this Code section shall not relieve any physician, or surgeon, certified nurse practitioner,
or physician assistant from any civil liability arising from his or her own negligent
administration or performance of artificial insemination."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 329
- 3 -